Alaska statutes. Title 47. Welfare, Social Services, and Institutions.
Article 2. Construction of Mental Health Hospitals and Facilities.

Sec. 47.30.350.
Department powers and duties; ratification of authority’s actions.

The department shall

develop and submit to the Surgeon General of the United States Public Health Service a comprehensive program for the constructing and equipping of hospitals and other facilities for the examination, observation, care, and treatment of the mentally ill;

develop and submit to the Surgeon General plans and specifications for the constructing and equipping of the hospitals and other facilities;

construct and equip the hospitals and other facilities in accordance with the program, plans, and specifications approved by the Surgeon General; construction and equipping under this paragraph is governed by AS 36.30 (State Procurement Code);

cooperate, coordinate, and contract, wherever indicated and desirable, with other state boards, departments and agencies, and agencies of the United States in the construction program, and hire necessary personnel and enter into contracts with private individuals and companies, to the end that the hospitals and other facilities are constructed in the most economical and expeditious manner; contracting and construction under this section are governed by AS 36.30 (State Procurement Code).

An action, agreement, or transaction taken or entered before April 3, 1957, by the Mental Health Authority consistent with AS

47.30.350

—

47.30.400

is affirmed and ratified.

History.

(§ 2 ch 160 SLA 1957; am § 58 ch 106 SLA 1986)

Sec. 47.30.360.
Acceptance and expenditure of funds.

The department may accept on behalf of the state and deposit separate and apart from other public funds grants from the federal government or gifts or contributions from other sources to assist in carrying out the purposes of AS

47.30.350

—

47.30.400

and may expend the funds for those purposes.

History.

(§ 3 ch 160 SLA 1957)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1990 the phrase “may expend” was substituted for “to expend” in the last line of this section to correct a manifest error in the 1962 codification.

Sec. 47.30.370.
Review by legislative budget and audit committee.

Before implementation, the programs, plans, and actions of the department made under AS

47.30.350

, except for the proposed geographic location of the mental health hospital, shall be reviewed by the legislative budget and audit committee.
The review and findings of the budget and audit committee shall be made public.

History.

(§ 4 ch 160 SLA 1957; am § 54 ch 71 SLA 1972)

Sec. 47.30.380.
Appropriation authorized.

Funds to carry out AS

47.30.350

—

47.30.400

shall be set out in the appropriation bill authorizing the operating and capital expenditures of the state’s integrated comprehensive mental health program under AS

37.14.003(a)

and submitted to the legislature under AS 37.07.020(a)(1).

History.

(§ 6 ch 160 SLA 1957; am § 11 ch 30 SLA 1997; am § 14 ch 59 SLA 1997)

Sec. 47.30.390.
Acquisition of existing mental health care facilities.

The department may acquire existing facilities for mental health care.

History.

(§ 1 ch 155 SLA 1959)

Sec. 47.30.400.
Purpose of AS 47.30.350—47.30.400.

The purpose of AS

47.30.350

—

47.30.400

is to provide for the constructing and equipping of hospitals and other facilities in this state needed for carrying out a comprehensive mental health program, to accept the benefits of 42 U.S.C. 274, and to authorize the department to take action necessary to accomplish these purposes.

History.

(§ 1 ch 160 SLA 1957)

Revisor’s notes. —

The federal law referred to in this section, 42 U.S.C. 274, related to grants to the state for mental health programs and payment for hospital facility construction. The provision was omitted in the 1984 general revision of that part of the federal code by Pub. L. 98-501, Title II, § 201.